Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 1

General Provisions

63-7-101. Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to safeguard life and health by requiring each person who is practicing or is offering to practice nursing to submit evidence that the person is qualified to practice and to be licensed as provided in this chapter. Such evidence of qualifications shall be submitted to the state board of nursing, which is the regulatory body authorized to enforce this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-729; Acts 1990, ch. 651, § 1; 2005, ch. 387, § 1.

Cross-References. Duties of nurses regarding known or suspected child sexual abuse, §§ 37-1-403, 37-1-605.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Loan-scholarship program for graduate students in professional nursing, § 49-4-702.

Prevention of HIV transmission, rulemaking authority, § 68-11-222.

Training of nurses to include courses in detection and treatment of child sexual abuse, § 49-7-117.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority to set standards for public school nurses, OAG 98-073, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (3/31/98).

63-7-102. Exemptions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as applying to:

The domestic administration of family remedies or the furnishing of assistance in the case of an emergency;

Persons employed in the office of a licensed physician or dentist, assisting in the nursing care of patients where adequate medical or nursing supervision, or both, is provided;

The practice of nursing incidental to a program of study by students enrolled in nursing education programs approved by the board;

Persons belonging to a recognized church or religious denomination having religious teachings and beliefs in regard to the care of the sick by prayer;

Care of persons in their homes by domestic servants, housekeepers, attendants or household aides of any type, whether employed regularly or because of an emergency or illness if such persons are not initially employed in a nursing capacity;

The practice of any lawfully qualified nurse of another state who is employed by the United States government or any bureau, division or agency thereof while in the discharge of the nurse's official duties in this state;

The practice of any currently licensed nurse of another state who is presenting educational programs or consultative services within this state for a period not to exceed fourteen (14) days in a calendar year;

The practice of any currently licensed nurse of another state whose responsibilities include transporting patients into, out of or through this state. Such exemption shall be limited to a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours for each transport;

The practice of nursing by students who are enrolled in board-approved refresher programs or comprehensive orientation programs;

Persons trained in accordance with § 68-1-904(c) who are:

Providing personal support services to clients living in their own home or private residence pursuant to a contract or agreement under any medicaid waiver or other program of the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities;

Employed by agencies that are both licensed under title 33 and under contract to provide residential or adult day programs for people with intellectual disabilities and persons trained in accordance with § 68-1-904(c); or

Employed by community-based licensed intermediate care facilities for people with intellectual disabilities who will administer medication only at a location other than the community-based facility. The employees of the community-based licensed intermediate care facilities for people with intellectual disabilities may additionally receive medication administration training specific to the person served. For the purposes of this subdivision (10)(C), when administered by employees of the intermediate care facilities, medications shall be packaged in individual doses labeled with the name of the individual patient, the time of administration and the drug name and dosage;

Except for those persons covered under subdivision (10)(A), a person employed by an agency licensed under title 33, chapter 2, part 4 providing personal support services to clients living in their own home or private residence may assist the client with medication, except for injections, upon a written authorization by the client or the client's authorized representative. For the purpose of this section, assistance is limited to opening medication packaging and providing medication reminders and does not permit giving the client any form of medication. Before any such person is authorized to assist the client with medication as provided in this subdivision (11), the person shall receive and be able to document training in medication assistance performed by or under the general supervision of a registered nurse and consistent with the state's home and community-based services (HCBS) training in assisting with medications. For the purposes of this subdivision (11), assisting with medications is not to be interpreted in any manner or fashion to include, or to be the same as, medication administration that would be only appropriate and acceptable for persons who are authorized so to do by specific professional acts under this title or by rules or regulations;

Persons trained in accordance with § 68-1-904(c)(2), who are employed by agencies that are both licensed under title 37 and under contract with the department of children's services to provide services, can assist children and youth with the self-administration of medication in a group home setting. Before that person is authorized to assist the child or youth with self-administration of medication, that person must have received and be able to document six (6) hours of training in medication administration from a registered nurse licensed pursuant to this chapter;

For the purposes of subdivision (12)(A), assisting with self-administration of medications is not to be interpreted in any manner or fashion to include, or to be the same as, medication administration that would be only appropriate and acceptable for persons who are authorized to do so by specific professional acts under this title or by rules or regulations; and

Except to the extent that it applies to the administration of medication, an individual who holds a valid medication technician certificate issued under this chapter, if the medication is administered in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-739; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 2; 1985, ch. 39, § 1; 1993, ch. 357, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2004, ch. 577, § 1; 2005, ch. 210, § 2; 2005, ch. 387, § 2; 2006, ch. 846, § 1; 2007, ch. 364, § 3; 2007, ch. 399, § 1; 2008, ch. 850, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 403, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 99; 2011, ch. 158, §§ 31, 32.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 477, § 1, directed the code commission to change all references from “division of mental retardation services” to “division of intellectual disabilities services” and to include the changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

63-7-103. “Practice of professional nursing” and “professional nursing” defined.

“Practice of professional nursing” means the performance for compensation of any act requiring substantial specialized judgment and skill based on knowledge of the natural, behavioral and nursing sciences and the humanities as the basis for application of the nursing process in wellness and illness care.

“Professional nursing” includes:

Responsible supervision of a patient requiring skill and observation of symptoms and reactions and accurate recording of the facts;

Promotion, restoration and maintenance of health or prevention of illness of others;

Counseling, managing, supervising and teaching of others;

Administration of medications and treatments as prescribed by a licensed physician, dentist, podiatrist, or nurse authorized to prescribe pursuant to § 63-7-123, or selected, ordered, or administered by an advanced practice registered nurse specializing as a certified registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA) during services ordered by a physician, dentist, or podiatrist and provided by a CRNA in collaboration with the ordering physician, dentist, or podiatrist that are within the scope of practice of the CRNA and authorized by clinical privileges granted by the medical staff of the facility. A CRNA shall collaborate in a cooperative working relationship with the ordering physician, dentist, or podiatrist in the provision of patient care, which includes consultation regarding patient treatment and cooperation in the management and delivery of health care;

Application of such nursing procedures as involve understanding of cause and effect; and

Nursing management of illness, injury or infirmity including identification of patient problems.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the practice of professional nursing does not include acts of medical diagnosis or the development of a medical plan of care and therapeutics for a patient, except to the extent such acts may be authorized by §§ 63-1-132, 63-7-123 and 63-7-207.

This section does not preclude a qualified registered nurse from determining whether a patient presenting to a hospital has an emergency medical condition if the determination is pursuant to:

A cooperative working relationship with a physician; and

Protocols jointly developed by the hospital's medical and nursing leadership and adopted by the hospital's medical staff and governing body.

The protocols described in subdivision (c)(1) must include a requirement that the qualified registered nurse obtain the concurrence of a physician when making a determination authorized under subdivision (c)(1).

As used in this subsection (c):

“Emergency medical condition” means:

A medical condition manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity, including severe pain, such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in:

Placing the health of the individual or, with respect to a pregnant woman, the health of the woman or the woman's unborn child, in serious jeopardy;

Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; and

With respect to a pregnant woman who is having contractions:

That there is inadequate time to effect a safe transfer to another hospital before delivery; or

That transfer may pose a threat to the health or safety of the woman or the woman's unborn child; and

“Qualified registered nurse” means a registered nurse who has been approved by the hospital governing body, based on the recommendation of hospital nursing leadership, as possessing the skills and competency to make a determination of the existence of a specified emergency medical condition of a patient presenting to a hospital.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 12; 1972, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-740; Acts 1990, ch. 651, § 2; 2015, ch. 513, § 2; 2016, ch. 980, § 11; 2019, ch. 12, § 1.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 12, § 2. March 20, 2019.

63-7-104. Registered nurse qualifications.

An applicant for a license to practice professional nursing shall submit to the board evidence in such form as the board may prescribe that such applicant:

Is in good physical and mental health;

Holds a diploma from a four-year accredited high school, or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the board; and

Has successfully completed a course of study in an approved school of nursing, as defined by the board, and the applicant holds a diploma or degree from an approved school of nursing or the approved school has certified to the board that the applicant has met all requirements for a diploma or degree.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-741; Acts 1984, ch. 848, § 1.

63-7-105. Registered nurse licensure.

By Examination. An applicant for a license to practice professional nursing shall be required to pass an examination in such subjects as the board may determine. The board shall issue a license to practice professional nursing to an applicant who successfully completes the examination.

Without Examination. The board may issue a license to practice professional nursing to a professional or registered nurse who has been duly licensed in another state or territory if, in the opinion of the board, the individual meets the professional nurse qualifications that, at the time of the applicant's graduation, were in effect in this state.

Temporary Permits. The board may issue a temporary permit to a professional or registered nurse duly licensed according to the laws of another state and who has made application for permanent licensure in Tennessee. A permit issued under this subsection (c) shall be valid for a single period of six (6) months.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 14; 1976, ch. 501, §§ 3, 13; 1978, ch. 678, § 1; 1981, ch. 462, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-742; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 3; 1985, ch. 39, § 11; 2005, ch. 387, § 3.

63-7-106. Registered nurse fees — Certification to other states.

The applicant for a license to practice as a professional or registered nurse by examination must pay a fee as set by the board and the board may direct, by regulation, that a part of the fee shall be paid directly to a testing service by the applicant.

An unsuccessful applicant for licensure by examination may rewrite the examination upon payment of a fee as set by the board, and the board may direct, by regulation, that a part of the fee shall be paid directly to a testing service by the applicant.

The applicant for a license to practice as a professional or registered nurse without examination under § 63-7-105(b) shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a temporary permit shall pay a fee as set by the board.

Any person who holds a license to practice professional nursing under this chapter, and who seeks to be licensed in another state by endorsement on the basis of the person's Tennessee license, shall have the license certified by the board for a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a duplicate original license or a duplicate renewal certificate shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a school transcript shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a change in name shall pay a fee as set by the board.

An applicant for a certificate of fitness or a temporary certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-7-123 shall pay a fee as set by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 15; 1976, ch. 501, §§ 4, 5; 1981, ch. 462, §§ 3-5; T.C.A., § 63-743; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 4; 1985, ch. 39, §§ 2-4; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 194-200; 1992, ch. 822, § 2; 2005, ch. 387, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Health Professionals' Access to Hospitals: A Retrospective and Prospective Analysis, 34 Vand. L. Rev. 1161 (1981).

63-7-107. Use of “registered nurse” title.

Any person who holds a license to practice professional nursing under this chapter shall, during the effective period of such license, be entitled to use the title “nurse,” “registered nurse,” or the abbreviation “R.N.” No other person shall assume such titles or use such abbreviation or any other words, letters or signs to indicate that the person using the same is a professional or registered nurse.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 16; T.C.A., § 63-744; Acts 2004, ch. 573, § 1.

63-7-108. “Practice of practical nursing” defined.

The “practice of practical nursing” means the performance for compensation of selected acts required in the nursing care of the ill, injured or infirm and/or carrying out medical orders prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist under the direction of a licensed physician, dentist or professional registered nurse. The licensed practical nurse shall have preparation in and understanding of nursing, but shall not be required to have the same degree of education and preparation as required of a registered nurse.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 17; T.C.A., § 63-745.

63-7-109. Practical nurse qualifications.

An applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board evidence in such form as the board may prescribe that the applicant:

Is in good physical and mental health;

Has completed the twelfth grade or its equivalent or has successfully passed the test for and has received a general equivalency diploma and such other preliminary qualifications and requirements as the board may prescribe; and

Has successfully completed a course of study in an approved school for practical nurses, as defined by the board, and the applicant holds a certificate therefrom, or the approved school has certified to the board that the applicant has met all requirements for a certificate.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 18; 1981, ch. 462, §§ 6, 7; T.C.A., § 63-746; Acts 1984, ch. 848, § 2.

63-7-110. Practical nurse licensure.

By Examination. An applicant for a license to practice practical nursing shall be required to pass a written examination as prescribed by the board. The board shall issue a license to practice practical nursing to an applicant who successfully completes the examination.

Without Examination. The board may issue a license to a licensed practical nurse who has been duly licensed in another state or territory if, in the opinion of the board, the individual meets the practical nurse qualifications that, at the time of the applicant's graduation, were in effect in this state.

Temporary Permits. The board may issue a temporary permit to a practical nurse duly licensed according to the laws of another state and who has made application for a permanent license in Tennessee. A permit issued under the provisions of this subsection (c) shall be valid for a single period of six (6) months.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 19; 1976, ch. 501, § 6; 1978, ch. 678, § 2; 1981, ch. 462, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-747; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 5; 2005, ch. 387, § 5.

63-7-111. Practical nurse fees — Certification to other states.

The applicant for a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay an examination fee as set by the board, and the board may direct, by regulation, that a part of the fee shall be paid directly to a testing service by the applicant.

An applicant to rewrite an examination shall pay an examination fee as set by the board, and the board may direct, by regulation, that a part of the fee shall be paid directly to a testing service by the applicant.

The applicant to practice as a licensed practical nurse without examination under § 63-7-110(b) shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a permit shall pay a fee as set by the board.

Any person who holds a license to practice as a practical nurse under this chapter and who seeks to be licensed in another state by endorsement on the basis of the person's Tennessee license shall have the license certified by the board for a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a duplicate original license or a duplicate renewal certificate shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a school transcript shall pay a fee as set by the board.

The applicant for a change in name shall pay a fee as set by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 20; 1976, ch. 501, § 7; 1981, ch. 462, §§ 9-12; T.C.A., § 63-748; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 6; 1985, ch. 39, §§ 5-7; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 201-208; 2005, ch. 387, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Health Professionals' Access to Hospitals: A Retrospective and Prospective Analysis, 34 Vand. L. Rev. 1161 (1981).

63-7-112. Use of “licensed practical nurse” title.

Any person who holds a license to practice practical nursing under this chapter shall, during the effective period of such license, be entitled to use the title “nurse,” “licensed practical nurse” or the abbreviation “L.P.N.” No other person shall assume such titles or use such abbreviation or any other words, letters or signs to indicate that the person using the same is a licensed practical nurse.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 21; T.C.A., § 63-749; Acts 2004, ch. 573, § 2.

63-7-113. Examinations.

An examination for both the professional and practical nurses shall be held at least once each year at such time and place as the board may determine and additional examinations as the board may deem necessary.

The board shall appoint the number of nurses and proctors necessary to administer the examination in each place designated and make such rules and regulations in regard to the examinations as are essential to efficient service. Each nurse or proctor shall receive fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for each day of service, and in addition thereto, shall be reimbursed for travel and other necessary expenses. Such expenses shall be claimed and paid in accordance with the prevailing travel regulations of the state government.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 22; 1976, ch. 501, § 8; T.C.A., § 63-750; Acts 2005, ch. 387, § 7.

63-7-114. Renewal of license.

All licensed professional or registered nurses shall submit an application for renewal of licensure registration to the board of nursing with a biennial renewal fee as set by the board.

Each licensed practical nurse shall submit an application for the renewal of licensure registration to the board with a biennial renewal fee as set by the board.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board shall determine that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (c).

The executive director of the board shall notify each person holding a current licensure registration to practice as a professional or registered nurse or as a practical nurse at least sixty (60) days prior to the due date of the renewal fee that the fee is due. Failure of any licensee to receive such notice shall not relieve or exempt such licensee from the requirements of this section.

The license of any nurse who fails to renew the licensure registration, provide any information requested by the board to perform its duties or pay any fees required by this chapter shall be automatically revoked unless registration is made within sixty (60) days. Reinstatement may be obtained upon good cause being shown to the board, payment of all past due fees and upon payment of a reinstatement fee as set by the board. The board may request evidence of nursing competence prior to renewal of the nursing license.

Any nurse who has not been engaged in the practice of nursing for five (5) years or more shall be issued an inactive license. If such nurse desires to resume practice, notice in writing shall be given to the board and evidence of nursing competence may be required prior to license renewal. The board shall evaluate, on an individual basis, evidence of nursing competence, which may include, but is not limited to, continuing education, a refresher program, comprehensive orientation program, employment in a health-related policy position or nursing educational program.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 23; 1972, ch. 523, § 2; 1976, ch. 501, § 9; 1981, ch. 462, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-751; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 7; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 27-29; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 209-211; 2005, ch. 387, §§ 8, 9.

63-7-115. Grounds for denial, revocation or suspension of certificate or license.

The board has the power to deny, revoke or suspend any certificate or license to practice nursing or to otherwise discipline a licensee upon proof that the person:

Is guilty of fraud or deceit in procuring or attempting to procure a license to practice nursing;

Is guilty of a crime;

Is unfit or incompetent by reason of negligence, habits or other cause;

Is addicted to alcohol or drugs to the degree of interfering with nursing duties;

Is mentally incompetent;

Is guilty of unprofessional conduct; or

Has violated or attempted to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisted in or abetted the violation of or conspired to violate any provision of this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto.

This section shall also apply to members of the board.

The board shall have concurrent enforcement power, pursuant to § 63-1-122 [repealed], with the division to revoke or suspend any certificate of fitness of a nurse practitioner who has been issued a certificate of fitness pursuant to § 63-1-104 or to otherwise discipline such person in accordance with this section.

The board may utilize one (1) or more screening panels in its investigative and disciplinary process to assure that complaints filed and investigations conducted are meritorious and to act as a mechanism for diversion to professional peer review organizations and/or impaired professionals associations or foundations those cases that the board, through established guidelines, deems appropriate. Upon diversion, such entities shall retain the same immunity as provided by law for the board.

The screening panels shall consist of as many members as the board directs, but shall include at least one (1) but no more than three (3) licensed nurses, who may be members of the board or may serve either voluntarily or through employment by or under contract with the board.

The activities of the screening panels and any mediation or arbitration sessions shall not be construed as meetings of an agency for purposes of the open meetings law, compiled in title 8, chapter 44, and shall remain confidential. The members of the screening panels, mediators and arbitrators have a deliberative privilege and the same immunity as provided by law for the board and are not subject to deposition or subpoena to testify regarding any matter or issue raised in any contested case, criminal prosecution or civil lawsuit that may result from or be incident to cases processed before them.

The board retains jurisdiction to modify or refuse to modify, upon request of any party, any of its orders issued pursuant to this section in compliance with procedures established by the board. The board, pursuant to duly promulgated rules, may, whenever a final order is issued after a disciplinary contested case hearing that contains findings that a licensee or other person has violated any provision of this chapter, assess the costs directly related to the prosecution of the case against the licensee or person.

Any elected officer of the board or any duly appointed or elected chair of any panel of the board or any screening panel and any hearing officer, arbitrator or mediator has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses and, upon probable cause being established, issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 24; 1976, ch. 501, § 10; 1980, ch. 851, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-752; Acts 1982, ch. 712, § 8; 1998, ch. 1047, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former section 63-1-122, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 1043, § 5, effective June 11, 2010.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

Attorney General Opinions. The emergency services board does not have authority to develop and use screening panels to assist with the processing and disposition of disciplinary cases; however, the board of chiropractic examiners, board of medical examiners, and board of nursing are authorized by statute to use screening panels in their investigative and disciplinary processes, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

The board of nursing has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-7-116. License revocation or suspension procedure — Reissuance — Contested case hearings.

Any person may prefer charges against a nurse for violation of any grounds of discipline mentioned in § 63-7-115. The charges shall be in writing and submitted to the board unless they originate with the board or a member thereof.

Unless the charges are dismissed without a hearing by the board as unfounded or not warranting further investigation, the board shall, within ninety (90) days from the date on which the charges are preferred, set a time, date and place for a hearing on the charges. The date set for the hearing shall not be more than six (6) months from the date on which the charges are preferred.

A copy of the charges, together with the notice of the time and place of the hearing, shall be furnished to the accused, which may be done by registered mail directed to the address furnished to the board at the time of registration, at least thirty (30) days before the date fixed for the hearing.

The chair or the vice chair of the board has the power to administer oaths, issue subpoenas and enforce the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records and papers at any hearing on any matter that the board has power to investigate.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides; and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

At the hearing, the accused shall have the right to appear personally and by counsel to cross-examine witnesses to produce evidence and witnesses, and shall also have the right to have subpoenas issued by the board to compel the attendance of all witnesses considered by the parties to be necessary to a full and complete hearing.

After the hearing, if a majority of the members of the board present vote in favor of finding the accused guilty of any of the charges, the board shall suspend or revoke the certificate of registration of the accused as in its judgment the offense deserves.

Review of the action of the board in suspending or revoking any license shall be pursuant to title 27, chapter 9.

The board may reissue any license that it has revoked if a majority of the members of the board present vote in favor of the reissuance of the license for reasons the board may consider sufficient.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for purposes of contested case hearings and disciplinary matters, three (3) or more members shall constitute a quorum and the board chair is authorized, when it is deemed necessary, to split the board into panels of three (3) or more members, each to conduct contested case hearings or disciplinary matters. A majority vote of the members present on any duly constituted panel shall be required to authorize board action in disciplinary matters and contested case hearings. The board chair shall have the authority to appoint board members to serve, as necessary, on the panels regardless of the grand division from which the appointed member was chosen or the member's status as a nurse or non-nurse member. The participation of a non-nurse board member creates no rights in any individual concerning the composition of any panel in any disciplinary matter or contested case hearing. The unavailability of a member of any panel before rendition of a final order shall not require substitution of another member unless the unavailability results in there being less than the quorum required by this section for contested case hearings or disciplinary matters. Any substitute required shall use any existing record and may conduct any further proceedings as are necessary in the interest of justice. A decision by the panel shall be deemed an order of the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 25; 1972, ch. 523, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-753; Acts 1984, ch. 755, § 7; 1985, ch. 39, §§ 8, 9, 12; 2008, ch. 849, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Law Reviews.

Review of Administrative Decisions by Writ of Certiorari in Tennessee (Ben. H. Cantrell), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 19.

63-7-117. Application for school accreditation.

An institution desiring to conduct a school of professional nursing or a school of practical nursing on ground, distance, online or via other electronic means must apply to the board for approval, and submit evidence that it is prepared to:

Carry out the prescribed basic professional nursing curriculum or the prescribed curriculum for practical nursing, as the case may be; and

Meet other standards established by this chapter or by the board.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 26; T.C.A., § 63-754; Acts 2005, ch. 387, § 10.

63-7-118. Investigation of applicants for accreditation.

A survey of the institution or institutions and agencies with which the school is to be affiliated shall be made by the executive director or by a qualified nurse appointed for this purpose by the board. The school shall submit a written report to the board. If, in the opinion of the board, the requirements for an approved school are found to be met, the board shall approve such school and designate it as an approved school of nursing.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 27; T.C.A., § 63-755; Acts 2005, ch. 387, § 11.

63-7-119. Survey of schools and report — Loss of accreditation.

At least once every eight (8) years, the executive director or other authorized employee shall survey each school of nursing in Tennessee and submit a written report to the board. If the board determines that a school of nursing previously approved is not maintaining the required standards, written notice shall be furnished the school with a specification of the deficiencies claimed to exist by the board. After a hearing, which shall be afforded if demanded, a school that fails to correct the deficiencies written in such notice within the time specified shall be removed from the list of approved schools of nursing.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 28; T.C.A., § 63-756; Acts 1985, ch. 39, § 10; 2005, ch. 387, § 12.

63-7-120. Violations and penalties.

It is a Class B misdemeanor for any person, corporation or association to:

Sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any nursing diploma, license or record, or aid or abet therein;

Practice nursing as defined by this chapter under cover of any diploma, license or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or assigned or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

Practice nursing as defined by this chapter unless duly licensed to do so under this chapter;

Use in connection with the person's name any designation tending to imply that the person is a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse unless duly licensed so to practice under this chapter;

Practice nursing during the time the person's license issued under this chapter is suspended or revoked;

Conduct a school of nursing or a program for the training of practical nurses unless the school or program has been approved by the board; or

Otherwise violate any provisions of this chapter.

Legal procedure in prosecution of violations of this section shall be in accordance with general statutes.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 29; 1976, ch. 501, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-757; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-7-121. Validity of license issued on or before September 1, 1967.

Any person holding a license to practice as a registered or professional nurse or licensed practical nurse issued by the board that is valid on September 1, 1967, shall thereafter be considered to be licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 78, § 30; T.C.A., § 63-758.

63-7-122. Enjoining violations.

The board of nursing, in addition to the powers and duties expressly granted by this chapter in the matter of suspension or revocation of a license, is authorized and empowered to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction to enjoin:

Any person from practicing or from attempting to practice as a professional or registered nurse, as described in § 63-7-103, or as a licensed practical nurse, as described in § 63-7-108, without possessing a valid license;

Any licensee from practicing who has been found guilty of the acts enumerated in § 63-7-115; or

Any person from using the title “nurse” or from using any other title, abbreviation, or designation in connection with the person's name, occupation, or profession that indicates or implies that the person is a practicing nurse, but who does not possess a valid license or certificate from the board of nursing.

No injunction bond shall be required of the board.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts to hear and determine such causes as chancery causes and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in such injunctive proceedings.

Acts 1976, ch. 501, § 12; T.C.A., § 63-759; Acts 2019, ch. 245, § 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), divided the former subsection into the present introductory language and (a)(1) and (a)(2) by substituting “to enjoin: (1) Any person from practicing or from attempting” for “to enjoin from practicing any person who is practicing or attempting”, and substituting “a valid license; (2) Any licensee” for “a valid license or to enjoin any licensee”, substituted “described” for “defined” twice in (a)(1), added “or” at the end of (a)(2), and added (a)(3).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 245, § 3. May 2, 2019.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq),8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 281.